New York, session 2025-2026, A2483.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 749 of the real property actions 2 and proceedings law, as amended by section 19 of part M of chapter 36 of 3 the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. (a) Upon rendering a final judgment for petitioner, the court shall 5 issue a warrant directed to the sheriff of the county or to any consta- 6 ble or marshal of the city in which the property, or a portion thereof, 7 is situated, or, if it is not situated in a city, to any constable of 8 any town in the county, describing the property, stating the earliest 9 date upon which execution may occur pursuant to the order of the court, 10 and commanding the officer to remove all persons named in the proceed- 11 ing, provided upon a showing of good cause, the court may issue a stay 12 of re-letting or renovation of the premises for a reasonable period of 13 time. 14 (b) A warrant issued under this article shall include information 15 regarding suicide prevention resources in clear, bold face type of no 16 less than fourteen-point in size. Such information shall include, but 17 not be limited to, the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline and the 18 applicable Suicide Crisis telephone number as provided by the New York 19 State Office of Mental Health. Such information shall be provided to the 20 person or persons to be evicted or dispossessed at the time notice is 21 served as provided in subdivision two of this section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 23 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04446-01-5